Washington statutes.
RCW 34.08.040

Publication in register deemed official notice—Certification of material.

The publication of any information in the Washington State Register shall be deemed to be official notice of such information, and publication in the register of such information and materials shall be certified to be the true and correct copy of such rules or other information as filed in the code reviser's office. The code reviser shall certify, to any court of record, the publication of any notice or information, and attached to such certification shall be the agency's declaration of compliance with the provisions of the Open Public Meetings Act (chapter 42.30 RCW), the Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 34.05 RCW), and this chapter.

[ 1989 c 175 s 31; 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.